District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-1014

Docking tails of horses.

Repealed.

History

June 25, 1892, 27 Stat. 61, ch. 135, § 5
Mar. 2, 1911, 36 Stat. 1003, ch. 192
May 10, 1989, D.C. Law 7-231, § 29, 36 DCR 492
Apr. 29, 2004, D.C. Law 15-154, § 5, 50 DCR 10996

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-814.
1973 Ed., § 22-814.